Indiana, session 2026, HB1226.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-22-15-20.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.122-2011,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20.5. (a) This section applies only to a contract
awarded by a state agency.
(b) As used in this section, "Indiana business" refers to any of the
following:
(1) A business whose principal place of business is located in
Indiana.
(2) A business that pays a majority of its payroll (in dollar
volume) to residents of Indiana.
(3) A business that employs Indiana residents as a majority of its
employees.
(4) A business that makes significant capital investments in
Indiana.
(5) A business that has a substantial positive economic impact on
Indiana as defined by criteria developed under subsection (c).
(c) The Indiana department of administration shall consult with the
HB 1226—LS 6671/DI 137


Indiana economic development corporation in developing criteria for
determining whether a business is an Indiana business under subsection
(b). The Indiana department of administration may consult with the
Indiana economic development corporation to determine whether a
particular business meets the requirements of this section and the
criteria developed under this subsection.
(d) There are the following price preferences for supplies purchased
from an Indiana business or a business that is not an Indiana
business but offers to provide supplies manufactured, assembled,
or produced in Indiana:
(1) Five percent (5%) for a purchase expected by the state agency
to be less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(2) Three percent (3%) for a purchase expected by the state
agency to be at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) but
less than one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(3) One percent (1%) for a purchase expected by the state agency
to be at least one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(e) If an Indiana business offers to provide supplies manufactured,
assembled, or produced in Indiana, and if two (2) or more bids
submitted were the same, the following price preference is available to
the Indiana business, in addition to the price preference available under
subsection (d):
(1) Three percent (3%) for a purchase expected by the state
agency to be less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(2) Two percent (2%) for a purchase expected by the state agency
to be at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) but less
than one million dollars ($1,000,000).
(3) One percent (1%) for a purchase expected by the state agency
to be at least one million dollars ($1,000,000).
The Indiana department of administration shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 to establish guidelines for determining when supplies are
manufactured or assembled in Indiana.
(f) A business that wants to claim a preference provided under this
section must do all of the following:
(1) State in the business's bid that the business claims the
preference provided by this section.
(2) Provide the following information to the department:
(A) The location of the business's principal place of business.
If the business claims the preference as an Indiana business
described in subsection (b)(1), a statement explaining the
reasons the business considers the location named as the
business's principal place of business.
HB 1226—LS 6671/DI 137


(B) The amount of the business's total payroll and the amount
of the business's payroll paid to Indiana residents.
(C) The number of the business's employees and the number
of the business's employees who are Indiana residents.
(D) If the business claims the preference as an Indiana
business described in subsection (b)(4), a description of the
capital investments made in Indiana and a statement of the
amount of those capital investments.
(E) If the business claims the preference as an Indiana
business described in subsection (b)(5), a description of the
substantial positive economic impact the business has on
Indiana.
SECTION 2. IC 5-22-15-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) As used in this section, "flag" refers to either
of the following:
(1) The flag of the United States.
(2) The state flag (described in IC 1-2-2).
(b) A governmental body shall give a twenty-five percent (25%)
price preference for the purchase of flags that are manufactured
in the United States.
HB 1226—LS 6671/DI 137


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Government and Regulatory
Reform, to which was referred House Bill 1226, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
House with the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1226 as introduced.)
MILLER D
Committee Vote: Yeas 12, Nays 0
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1226 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 3, after line 12, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 2. IC 5-22-15-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) As used in this section, "flag" refers to either
of the following:
(1) The flag of the United States.
(2) The state flag (described in IC 1-2-2).
(b) A governmental body shall give a twenty-five percent (25%)
price preference for the purchase of flags that are manufactured
in the United States.".
(Reference is to HB 1226 as printed January 14, 2026.)
MOSELEY
HB 1226—LS 6671/DI 137